Utah statutes.
17C-1-404.   Tax increment under a post-June 30, 1993 project area plan.

(1)  This section applies to tax increment under a post-June 30, 1993 project area plan adopted before May 1, 2006, only.

(2)  An agency board may provide in the project area budget for the agency to be paid:

(a)  if 20% of the project area budget is allocated for housing under Section 17C-2-203:

(i)  100% of annual tax increment for 15 years;

(ii)  75% of annual tax increment for 24 years; or

(iii)  if approved by the taxing entity committee, any percentage of tax increment up to 100%, or any specified dollar amount, for any period of time; or

(b)  if 20% of the project area budget is not allocated for housing under Section 17C-2-203:

(i)  100% of annual tax increment for 12 years;

(ii)  75% of annual tax increment for 20 years; or

(iii)  if approved by the taxing entity committee, any percentage of tax increment up to 100%, or any specified dollar amount, for any period of time.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 359, 2006 General Session

